Maryland, session 2026, HB0773.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–936.
(a) In this section, “historic motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle, including a
passenger vehicle, motorcycle, or truck that:
(1) Is [a model year of 1999 or earlier] AT LEAST 30 YEARS OLD;
(2) Has not been substantially altered from the manufacturer’s original
design; and
(3) Meets criteria contained in regulations adopted by the Administration.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0773*

HOUSE BILL 773
(b) In this section, “historic motor vehicle” does not include a vehicle that has been
remanufactured or reconstructed as a replica of an original vehicle.
(c) If registered with the Administration under this section, every historic motor
vehicle is a Class L (historic) vehicle.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (i) of this section, for each Class L (historic)
vehicle, the annual registration fee is:
(1) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $45.50; and
(2) On or after July 1, 2025, $55.50.
(e) In applying for registration of a historic motor vehicle under this section, the
owner of the vehicle shall submit with the application a certification that the vehicle for
which the application is made:
(1) Will be maintained for use in exhibitions, club activities, parades, tours,
and occasional transportation; and
(2) Will not be used:
(i) For general daily transportation;
(ii) Primarily for the transportation of passengers or property on
highways;
(iii) For employment;
(iv) For transportation to and from employment or school; or
(v) For commercial purposes.
(f) Except as provided in § 13–936.1 of this subtitle, on registration of a vehicle
under this section, the Administration shall issue a special, historic motor vehicle
registration plate of the size and design that the Administration determines.
(g) Unless the presence of the equipment was specifically required by a statute of
this State as a condition of sale when the vehicle was manufactured, the presence of any
specific equipment is not required for the operation of a vehicle registered under this
section.
(h) (1) A vehicle with a model year of 1985 or earlier registered under this
section is exempt from any statute that requires vehicle inspections.
(2) A vehicle registered under this section is exempt from any statute that
requires the use and inspection of emission controls.

HOUSE BILL 773 3
(i) (1) For a motor vehicle manufactured at least 60 years prior to the current
model year, there is a onetime registration fee of $50.00.
(2) Registration of a motor vehicle manufactured under this subsection is
not transferable to a subsequent owner.
13–937.1.
(a) In this section, “street rod” means a motor vehicle that:
(1) Is [25 years old or older] AT LEAST 40 YEARS OLD; and
(2) Has been substantially altered from the manufacturer’s original design.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, if registered with the
Administration under this section, every street rod is a Class N (street rod) vehicle.
(c) For each Class N (street rod) vehicle, the annual registration fee is:
(1) On or after July 1, 2024, but before July 1, 2025, $45.00; and
(2) On or after July 1, 2025, $55.00.
(d) In applying for registration of a street rod under this section, the owner of the
street rod shall submit with the application a certification that the vehicle for which the
application is made:
(1) Will be maintained for use in exhibitions, club activities, parades, tours,
occasional transportation, and similar uses; and
(2) Will not be used:
(i) For general daily transportation; or
(ii) Primarily for the transportation of passengers or property on
highways.
(e) (1) The registration of a street rod registered before July 1, 1987, as a Class
L (historic) vehicle shall remain valid until midnight on the date indicated on the
registration card issued by the Administration.
(2) On expiration of a street rod’s registration as a Class L (historic)
vehicle, a street rod registered with the Administration shall be registered as a Class N
(street rod) vehicle as required by this section.

HOUSE BILL 773
(f) Except as provided in § 13–936.1 of this subtitle, on registration of a vehicle
under this section, the Administration shall issue a special street rod vehicle registration
plate of the size and design that the Administration determines.
(g) Unless the presence of the equipment was specifically required by a statute of
this State as a condition of sale when the vehicle was manufactured, the presence of any
specific equipment is not required for the operation of a vehicle registered under this
section.
(h) A vehicle registered under this section is exempt from any statute that
requires periodic vehicle inspections or that requires the use and inspection of emission
controls.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any historic motor vehicle or street rod registered before the effective date of
this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.